Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-1303
Capital improvements; prohibited; exceptions.

No capital improvements shall be made to any farm land owned by the State of Nebraska, its departments, boards or commissions, except that this provision shall not apply to the Board of Educational Lands and Funds, the Department of Correctional Services, the Department of Health and Human Services, or the University of Nebraska or projects where the only purpose of the capital improvement would be soil and water conservation.

Laws 1967, c. 461, § 3, p. 1431;

Laws 1973, LB 563, § 13;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 789.